Washington statutes.
RCW 19.405.060

Clean energy implementation plan—Compliance criteria—Incremental cost of compliance.

(1)(a) By January 1, 2022, and every four years thereafter, each investor-owned utility must develop and submit to the commission:

(i) A four-year clean energy implementation plan for the standards established under RCW 19.405.040(1) and 19.405.050(1) that proposes specific targets for energy efficiency, demand response, and renewable energy; and

(ii) Proposed interim targets for meeting the standard under RCW 19.405.040(1) during the years prior to 2030 and between 2030 and 2045.

(b) An investor-owned utility's clean energy implementation plan must:

(i) Be informed by the investor-owned utility's clean energy action plan developed under RCW 19.280.030;

(ii) Be consistent with subsection (3) of this section; and

(iii) Identify specific actions to be taken by the investor-owned utility over the next four years, consistent with the utility's long-range integrated resource plan and resource adequacy requirements, that demonstrate progress toward meeting the standards under RCW 19.405.040(1) and 19.405.050(1) and the interim targets proposed under (a)(i) of this subsection. The specific actions identified must be informed by the investor-owned utility's historic performance under median water conditions and resource capability and by the investor-owned utility's participation in centralized markets. In identifying specific actions in its clean energy implementation plan, the investor-owned utility may also take into consideration any significant and unplanned loss or addition of load it experiences.

(c) The commission, after a hearing, must by order approve, reject, or approve with conditions an investor-owned utility's clean energy implementation plan and interim targets. The commission may, in its order, recommend or require more stringent targets than those proposed by the investor-owned utility. The commission may periodically adjust or expedite timelines if it can be demonstrated that the targets or timelines can be achieved in a manner consistent with the following:

(i) Maintaining and protecting the safety, reliable operation, and balancing of the electric system;

(ii) Planning to meet the standards at the lowest reasonable cost, considering risk;

(iii) Ensuring that all customers are benefiting from the transition to clean energy: Through the equitable distribution of energy and nonenergy benefits and the reduction of burdens to vulnerable populations and highly impacted communities; long-term and short-term public health and environmental benefits and reduction of costs and risks; and energy security and resiliency; and

(iv) Ensuring that no customer or class of customers is unreasonably harmed by any resulting increases in the cost of utility-supplied electricity as may be necessary to comply with the standards.

(2)(a) By January 1, 2022, and every four years thereafter, each consumer-owned utility must develop and submit to the department a four-year clean energy implementation plan for the standards established under RCW 19.405.040(1) and 19.405.050(1) that:

(i) Proposes interim targets for meeting the standard under RCW 19.405.040(1) during the years prior to 2030 and between 2030 and 2045, as well as specific targets for energy efficiency, demand response, and renewable energy;

(ii) Is informed by the consumer-owned utility's clean energy action plan developed under RCW 19.280.030(1) or other ten-year plan developed under RCW 19.280.030(5);

(iii) Is consistent with subsection (4) of this section; and

(iv) Identifies specific actions to be taken by the consumer-owned utility over the next four years, consistent with the utility's long-range resource plan and resource adequacy requirements, that demonstrate progress towards meeting the standards under RCW 19.405.040(1) and 19.405.050(1) and the interim targets proposed under (a)(i) of this subsection. The specific actions identified must be informed by the consumer-owned utility's historic performance under median water conditions and resource capability and by the consumer-owned utility's participation in centralized markets. In identifying specific actions in its clean energy implementation plan, the consumer-owned utility may also take into consideration any significant and unplanned loss or addition of load it experiences.

(b) The governing body of the consumer-owned utility must, after a public meeting, adopt the consumer-owned utility's clean energy implementation plan. The clean energy implementation plan must be submitted to the department and made available to the public. The governing body may adopt more stringent targets than those proposed by the consumer-owned utility and periodically adjust or expedite timelines if it can be demonstrated that such targets or timelines can be achieved in a manner consistent with the following:

(i) Maintaining and protecting the safety, reliable operation, and balancing of the electric system;

(ii) Planning to meet the standards at the lowest reasonable cost, considering risk;

(iii) Ensuring that all customers are benefiting from the transition to clean energy: Through the equitable distribution of energy and nonenergy benefits and reduction of burdens to vulnerable populations and highly impacted communities; long-term and short-term public health and environmental benefits and reduction of costs and risks; and energy security and resiliency; and

(iv) Ensuring that no customer or class of customers is unreasonably harmed by any resulting increases in the cost of utility-supplied electricity as may be necessary to comply with the standards.

(3)(a) An investor-owned utility must be considered to be in compliance with the standards under RCW 19.405.040(1) and 19.405.050(1) if, over the four-year compliance period, the average annual incremental cost of meeting the standards or the interim targets established under subsection (1) of this section equals a two percent increase of the investor-owned utility's weather-adjusted sales revenue to customers for electric operations above the previous year, as reported by the investor-owned utility in its most recent commission basis report. All costs included in the determination of cost impact must be directly attributable to actions necessary to comply with the requirements of RCW 19.405.040 and 19.405.050.

(b) If an investor-owned utility relies on (a) of this subsection as a basis for compliance with the standard under RCW 19.405.040(1), then it must demonstrate that it has maximized investments in renewable resources and nonemitting electric generation prior to using alternative compliance options allowed under RCW 19.405.040(1)(b).

(4)(a) A consumer-owned utility must be considered to be in compliance with the standards under RCW 19.405.040(1) and 19.405.050(1) if, over the four-year compliance period, the average annual incremental cost of meeting the standards or the interim targets established under subsection (2) of this section meets or exceeds a two percent increase of the consumer-owned utility's retail revenue requirement above the previous year. All costs included in the determination of cost impact must be directly attributable to actions necessary to comply with the requirements of RCW 19.405.040 and 19.405.050.

(b) If a consumer-owned utility relies on (a) of this subsection as a basis for compliance with the standard under RCW 19.405.040(1), and it has not met eighty percent of its annual retail electric load using electricity from renewable resources and nonemitting electric generation, then it must demonstrate that it has maximized investments in renewable resources and nonemitting electric generation prior to using alternative compliance options allowed under RCW 19.405.040(1)(b).

(5) The commission, for investor-owned utilities, and the department, for consumer-owned utilities, must adopt rules establishing the methodology for calculating the incremental cost of compliance under this section, as compared to the cost of an alternative lowest reasonable cost portfolio of investments that are reasonably available.

(6) The commission may require a large combination utility as defined in RCW 80.86.010 to incorporate the requirements of this section into an integrated system plan established under RCW 80.86.020.

[ 2024 c 351 s 14; 2019 c 288 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 351: See note following RCW 80.86.010.